img/fsts/ya.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>

LEXICON Root

Letters ;

LEXICON Launching

Letters ;
# ;

LEXICON Letters

я:йа Launching ;
!ё:йо Launching ;
!ю:йу Launching ;
й:й Launching ;
а:а Launching ;
!о:о Launching ;
!у:у Launching ;
…:… Launching ;
